Utah statutes.
59-7-502.   Change of taxable year or accounting period.

(1)  If a corporation changes its taxable year for federal income tax purposes, the new taxable year shall become the corporation's taxable year for Utah corporate franchise or income tax purposes.

(2)  If a corporation which does not file a federal tax return changes its accounting period, the new accounting period shall become the corporation's taxable year for Utah corporate franchise or income tax purposes if the change is approved by the commission.

